Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Subchapter 3. Duties and Powers of Prudential Committee

§ 11-3.1.
Duties and powers of Prudential Committee.

The Prudential Committee in addition to other powers and duties specifically assigned and allowed by law for school boards shall:

Have the management of all business and affairs of the District and all authority and powers necessary for that purpose.

Elect its own Chair and Clerk and other officers deemed necessary during the first regular Prudential Committee meeting following the annual meeting every year.

Meet at least once each month, unless otherwise so voted by the Prudential Committee, and only after giving proper notice as to the time and place of the meeting.

Determine the educational policies of the School District, and prescribe rules and regulations for the conduct and management of the public schools in the District. Such rules and regulations shall be of general application to the District, shall be in
writing, codified, and made available to the public. Regulations shall be adopted only at regularly scheduled or specifically scheduled Prudential Committee meetings after giving at least ten days’ public notice of the substance
of the proposed regulation. Public notice of the substance of proposed regulations need not include verbatim copies of the proposed regulations, but shall indicate where complete copies may be obtained.

Have the power to take any action which is required for the sound administration of the School District.

Subject to the authority vested in the electorate of any School District official, have the possession, care, control, equipping, and management of the property of the School District.

Have discretion to furnish more than 12 years of instruction to students in deserving cases.

Relocate or discontinue use of any schoolhouse or facility.

Examine claims against the District for school expenses and draw orders for such as shall be allowed by it payable to the party entitled thereto. Such orders shall state definitely the purpose for which they are drawn. (9) (A) Examine claims against the
District for school expenses and draw orders for such as shall be allowed by it payable to the party entitled thereto. Such orders shall state definitely the purpose for which they are drawn.

However, it shall be lawful for the Prudential Committee to submit to its Treasurer a certified copy of the pay orders, properly signed by the Clerk and Chair or majority of the Board, showing all bills approved for payment by the Prudential Committee.
Such certified copy shall serve as full authority to the Treasurer to make the payments as thus approved. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall preclude the use of a voucher system, or any other system of sound accounting
and business procedure, provided that such system reflects the facts as recited in this subdivision.

Establish a system of accounts for the proper control of School District finances and for stating the annual financial condition of the School District.

Not less than ten days prior to the District’s annual meeting, prepare and distribute to the electorate a report of the conditions and needs of the District school system, including the Superintendent’s and Treasurer’s annual report for the previous school
year and an auditor’s report.

Annually prepare and include in the annual report a budget for the next school year.

Upon prior recommendation by the superintendent, employ and dismiss such persons as may be required to carry out the work of the School District.

Annually on or before August 5, prepare a report for the School District containing, on forms prescribed and furnished by the state, a statement under oath of the actual cash expenditures of the School District for the preceding school year for school
purposes, and other such information as the State prescribes. Such report shall be in triplicate, one copy shall be retained by the Superintendent, one copy shall be sent to the School District Clerk-Treasurer, and one copy sent
to the State on or before August 15.

Provide, at the expense of the District, subject to approval of the superintendent, all textbooks, learning materials, equipment, and supplies.

Exercise all the general powers given to a legislative branch of a municipality.

By its Chair, or any person designated by the Chair whose appointment is recorded in the minutes of the Prudential Committee, execute contracts on behalf of the School District. Contracts for leases of real or personal property for more than three years
or for the purchase and sale of real estate shall be executed only upon prior authorization of the electorate as specified by the laws of the State of Vermont.

Employ a public accountant to audit the financial affairs of the School District and prepare the annual financial report. The annual financial report shall be included in the annual report each year.

Be authorized to operate and maintain a recreation program.

Be authorized to negotiate and execute assessment and taxation agreements between the District and a taxpayer or taxpayers within the District consistent with the applicable requirements of the Vermont Constitution, notwithstanding section 5.1 of this
charter and the requirements of the general laws of the State of Vermont.

Be authorized to exempt from tax business personal property acquired by a taxpayer after September 30, 1995, notwithstanding section 5.1 of this charter and the requirements of the general laws of the State of Vermont.

HISTORY:
Amended

2013, No. 92
(Adj. Sess.), § 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.